Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6801
Genetic sequencing; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-6801 to 71-6804:

(1) Business means any:

(a) Sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, or limited liability business, including a wholly owned subsidiary, majority-owned subsidiary, parent business, or affiliate of those entities or business associations that exists to make a profit; and

(b) Nonprofit organization;

(2) Domicile means the country where:

(a) A business is registered and headquartered;

(b) A business primarily completes its affairs; and

(c) The majority stake of ownership of a business is located;

(3) Foreign adversary means any foreign government specified in federal code 15 C.F.R. 791.4, as such regulation existed on April 1, 2025;

(4) Genetic sequencer means any device or platform used to conduct genetic sequencing, resequencing, isolation, or other genetic research;

(5) Genetic sequencing means any method used to determine the identity and order of nucleotide bases in the human genome;

(6) Human genome means deoxyribonucleic acid or ribonucleic acid found in human cells;

(7) Medical facility means a facility that provides any health service and:

(a) Receives any money from the State of Nebraska or the United States Government;

(b) Is registered with the State of Nebraska to provide any health care service; or

(c) Conducts research or testing on, with, or relating to genetic sequencing or the human genome;

(8) Operational and research software means any computer program used for any operation, control, analysis, or other necessary function of genetic sequencing or genetic sequencers;

(9) Research facility means a facility that conducts research on, with, or relating to genetic sequencing or the human genome; and

(10) Software means any program, routine, or set of one or more programs or routines that is used or intended for use to cause the performance of a task or set of tasks relating to genetic sequencing or genetic sequencers by any computer, computer-related peripheral equipment, or combination thereof.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 32.